Massachusetts, session 194th, H34.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second sentence of clause (i)of subdivision (1) of section 3 of Chapter
32 is hereby amended by adding after the word “duty” the following words:
“or other reasons permitted under the family and medical leave laws pertaining to his
position”
of 1